Utah statutes.
48-2c-1206 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The division may dissolve a company under Section 48-2c-1207 if:

(1)  the company does not pay when due, any taxes, fees, or penalties imposed by this chapter or other applicable laws of this state;

(2)  the company does not file its annual report with the division when it is due;

(3)  the company is without a registered agent or registered office in this state; or

(4)  the company fails to give notice to the division that:

(a)  its registered agent has been changed;

(b)  its registered agent has resigned; or

(c)  the company's period of duration has expired.

